Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF402.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2413XS (3) 91 jm/jh S.F. 402 Section 1. Section 422.7, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 45. a. As used in this subsection, 3 ânursing facilityâ means a nursing facility licensed under 4 chapter 135C. 5 b. Subtract, to the extent included, the amount of expenses 6 paid to a nursing facility by the taxpayer for health-related 7 care and services. 8 Sec. 2. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This Act applies 9 retroactively to January 1, 2025, for tax years beginning on 10 or after that date. 11